District of Columbia statutes.
4-204.05a

Extension of transitional Medicaid program.

(a)

The Mayor shall extend the transitional Medicaid program to 24 months pursuant to the Family Support Act of 1988, approved October 13, 1988 (P.L. 100-485; 102 Stat. 2343), and the District of Columbia State Plan for Medicaid. The Mayor shall seek any waivers and exemptions from federal statutes and regulations necessary to make such an extension.

(b)

Increased transitional medical assistance benefits shall be made available to all working families eligible under subsection (a) of this section.

(c)

Earned income shall be disregarded under the extended Transitional Medicaid Program in accordance with § 4-205.11(a)(5)(B) [(a)(5) repealed].

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 405a
as added Oct. 27, 1995, D.C. Law 11-72, § 301, 42 DCR 4728
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 4(a), 46 DCR 905
1981 Ed., § 3-204.5a.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 4(c) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 4(a) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 4(a) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682),§ 4(a) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 4(a) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).

Expiration of Law 11-72

Section 401 of D.C. Law 11-72 provided that the act shall expire 5 years from the date of implementation of an approved federal waiver and rules promulgated by the Mayor.